Utah statutes.
20A-2-304.5.   County clerk's responsibilities -- Updating voter
registration.
(1)  A county clerk who receives notification from the lieutenant governor, as
provided in Subsection 20A-2-109(1), of a change in a registered voter's
principal place of residence or name may verify the change with the registered
voter.
(2)  Unless the county clerk verifies that a change described in Subsection
(1) is incorrect, the county clerk shall:
(a)  change the voter registration record to show the registered voter's
current name and address; and
(b)  notify the registered voter of the change to the voter registration
record.
